en: Small spiny lobsters
fr: Langoustes
hr: Mali bodljikavi jastozi
nl: Rivierkreeftjes

en: Jumbo shrimps
fr: Langoustines, Langoustine crue
hr: Jumbo škampi
nl: Langoustines

en: Frozen jumbo shrimps
fr: Langoustines surgelées, Langoustine surgelée

en: Cooked jumbo shrimps
fr: Langoustines cuites

en: Frozen cooked jumbo shrimps
fr: Langoustines cuites surgelées

en: Breaded scampi
fr: Langoustines panées

en: Frozen crustaceans
fr: Crustacés surgelés

en: Fishes and their products
fr: Poissons et dérivés
hr: Ribama i njihovim proizvodima
nl: Vis- en afgeleide producten
zh: 鱼类及其制品

en: Fishes, fish
bg: Риба
ca: Peix
cs: Ryby
da: Fisk
de: Fisch, Fische
es: Pescados, pescado
fi: kalat
fr: Poissons, Poisson
he: דגים, דג
hr: ribe, riba
hu: Hal, Halak
it: Pesci, pesce
ja: 魚, 魚類
nl: Vis
pl: Ryby, Ryba
pt: Peixe
ro: Pești
ru: Рыба
sv: Fiskar, fisk
tr: Balık
zh: 鱼类

en: Fish patties
fr: Galettes au poisson

en: Frozen seafood
bg: Замразени морски дарове
de: Gefrorene Meeresfrüchte
es: Marisco congelado
fi: Mereneläväpakasteet
fr: Fruits de mer surgelés
hr: smrznuti plodovi mora
it: Frutti di mare surgelati
nl: Diepvrieszeevruchten
pt: Frutos do mar congelados
ru: Замороженые морепродукты

en: Frozen cooked seafood
fr: Fruits de mer cuits surgelés

en: Cooked fish
fr: Poisson cuit
hr: Kuhana riba
pt: Peixe cozinhado

en: Freshwater fishes
fr: Poissons d'eau douce

en: Frozen freshwater fishes
fr: Poissons d'eau douce surgelés

en: Marine fishes
fr: Poissons de mer

en: Frozen marine fishes
fr: Poissons de mer surgelés

en: Farmed fishes
fr: Poissons d'élevage

en: Frozen farmed fishes
fr: Poissons d'élevage surgelés

en: Northern pike
fr: Brochet